New York, session 2025-2026, S10380.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 7603 of the education law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 3-a to read as follows: 3 (3-a) Domestic violence coursework: The commissioner shall require 4 applicants for licensure as licensed psychologist to complete no less 5 than three credit hours of graduate-level course work related to domes- 6 tic violence. 7 § 2. Subdivision 2 of section 7607 of the education law, as added by 8 chapter 436 of the laws of 2018, is amended to read as follows: 9 2. During each triennial registration period, an applicant for regis- 10 tration as a psychologist shall complete a minimum of thirty-six hours 11 of acceptable learning activities, a minimum of three hours of which 12 shall be course work in the area of professional ethics, including the 13 laws, rules and regulations for practice in New York. The commissioner 14 shall require the completion of domestic violence-related continuing 15 education of not less than two hours as part of the mandatory continuing 16 education requirements for license renewal. Any psychologist whose first 17 registration date following the effective date of this section occurs 18 less than three years from such effective date, but on or after January 19 first, two thousand twenty-one, shall complete continuing education 20 hours on a prorated basis at the rate of one hour per month for the 21 period beginning January first, two thousand twenty-one up to the first 22 registration date thereafter. A psychologist who has not satisfied the 23 mandatory continuing education requirement shall not be issued a trien- 24 nial registration certificate by the department and shall not practice 25 unless and until a conditional registration is issued as provided for in 26 subdivision three of this section. Continuing education hours taken 27 during one triennium may not be transferred to the subsequent triennium. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15559-01-6 S. 10380 2 1 § 3. Subdivision 2 of section 7704 of the education law is amended by 2 adding a new paragraph (c-1) to read as follows: 3 (c-1) Domestic violence coursework: The commissioner shall require 4 applicants for licensure as licensed clinical social workers to complete 5 no less than three credit hours of graduate-level course work related to 6 domestic violence. 7 § 4. Subdivision 2 of section 7710 of the education law, as added by 8 chapter 443 of the laws of 2013, is amended to read as follows: 9 2. During each triennial registration period an applicant for regis- 10 tration as a licensed master social worker or licensed clinical social 11 worker shall complete a minimum of thirty-six hours of acceptable formal 12 continuing education. The commissioner shall require the completion of 13 domestic violence-related continuing education of not less than two 14 hours as part of the mandatory continuing education requirements for 15 license renewal. Any licensed master social worker or licensed clinical 16 social worker whose first registration date following the effective date 17 of this section occurs less than three years from such effective date, 18 but on or after January first, two thousand fifteen, shall complete 19 continuing education hours on a prorated basis at the rate of one hour 20 per month for the period beginning January first, two thousand fifteen 21 up to the first registration date thereafter. A licensee who has not 22 satisfied the mandatory continuing education requirement shall not be 23 issued a triennial registration certificate by the department and shall 24 not practice unless and until a conditional registration is issued as 25 provided for in subdivision three of this section. Continuing education 26 hours taken during one triennium may not be transferred to the subse- 27 quent triennium. 28 § 5. Subdivision 3 of section 8402 of the education law is amended by 29 adding a new paragraph (c-1) to read as follows: 30 (c-1) Domestic violence coursework: The commissioner shall require 31 applicants for licensure as licensed mental health counselors to 32 complete no less than three credit hours of graduate-level course work 33 related to domestic violence. 34 § 6. Subdivision 3 of section 8403 of the education law is amended by 35 adding a new paragraph (c-1) to read as follows: 36 (c-1) Domestic violence coursework: The commissioner shall require 37 applicants for licensure as licensed marriage and family therapist to 38 complete no less than three credit hours of graduate-level course work 39 related to domestic violence. 40 § 7. Subdivision 2 of section 8412 of the education law, as added by 41 chapter 486 of the laws of 2013, is amended to read as follows: 42 2. During each triennial registration period an applicant for regis- 43 tration as a licensed mental health counselor, marriage and family ther- 44 apist, psychoanalyst, and creative arts therapist shall complete a mini- 45 mum of thirty-six hours of acceptable formal continuing education, a 46 maximum of twelve hours of which may be self-instructional course work 47 acceptable to the department. The commissioner shall require the 48 completion of domestic violence-related continuing education of not less 49 than two hours as part of the mandatory continuing education require- 50 ments for license renewal. Any licensed mental health counselor, 51 marriage and family therapist, psychoanalyst, and creative arts thera- 52 pist whose first registration date following the effective date of this 53 section occurs less than three years from such effective date, but on or 54 after January first, two thousand seventeen, shall complete continuing 55 education hours on a prorated basis at the rate of one hour per month 56 for the period beginning January first, two thousand seventeen up to the S. 10380 3 1 first registration date thereafter. A licensee who has not satisfied the 2 mandatory continuing education requirement shall not be issued a trien- 3 nial registration certificate by the department and shall not practice 4 unless and until a conditional registration certificate is issued as 5 provided for in subdivision three of this section. Continuing education 6 hours taken during one triennium may not be transferred to the subse- 7 quent triennium. 8 § 8. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 9 ing the date on which it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, 10 the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation neces- 11 sary for the implementation of this act on its effective date are 12 authorized to be made and completed on or before such effective date.